tests/morphophonology/russian_voiced_cons.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] г behaves as voiceless":
    бульдог<n><dat> : бульдогка
    тег<n><dat> : тегка
 
  "[twol] ж behaves as voiceless":
    багаж<n><dat> : багажга

  "[twol] б behaves as voiceless":
    клуб<n><dat> : клубка

  "[twol] д behaves as voiceless":
    гид<n><dat> : гидка

  "[twol] в behaves as voiceless":
    мотив<n><dat> : мотивка

  "[twol] з behaves as voiceless":
    гипофиз<n><dat> : гипофизга

    
  "[twol] п ":
    гаеп<n><px3sp><nom> : гаебе

  "[twol] к ":
    аръяк<n><px3sp><nom> : аръягы
